Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.260

When compensation furnished.

Compensation shall be furnished to an emergency worker either within or without the state for any injury arising out of and occurring in the course of his or her activities as an emergency worker, and for the death of any such worker if the injury proximately causes death, in those cases where the following conditions occur:

(1) Where, at the time of the injury the emergency worker is performing services as an emergency worker, and is acting within the course of his or her duties as an emergency worker.

(2) Where, at the time of the injury the local organization for emergency management with which the emergency worker is registered is an approved local organization for emergency management.

(3) Where the injury is proximately caused by his or her service as an emergency worker, either with or without negligence.

(4) Where the injury is not caused by the intoxication of the injured emergency worker.

(5) Where the injury is not intentionally self-inflicted.

[ 2011 c 336 s 797; 1984 c 38 s 27; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 29; 1953 c 223 s 10.]